Hawaii statutes.
§417E-8 Injunctions. Whenever it
appears to the commissioner that any person, including a controlling person of
an offeror or target company, has engaged or is about to engage in any act or
practice constituting a violation of this chapter or any rule or order
hereunder, the commissioner is authorized to:

(1) Issue and cause to be served upon any person
violating any of the provisions of this chapter an order requiring the person
guilty thereof to cease and desist therefrom; and

(2) Bring an action in the appropriate circuit court
to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or
any rule or order hereunder, or refer the matter to the attorney general.

Upon a proper showing, the court may grant a
permanent or temporary injunction or restraining order and may order rescission
of any sales or purchases of securities determined to be unlawful under this
chapter or any rule or order hereunder. The court may not require the
commissioner to post a bond. [L 1985, c 32, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next